Utah statutes.
53-1-117.   Alcohol or drug enforcement funding -- Rulemaking -- Legislative
findings.
(1)  From monies appropriated by the Legislature and any other funds made
available for the purposes described under this section, the department shall
assist the law enforcement agencies of the state and its political
subdivisions in the enforcement of alcohol or drug-related offenses.
(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commissioner shall make rules establishing criteria and procedures
for granting monies under this section to law enforcement agencies for:
(a)  providing equipment, including drug and alcohol testing equipment;
(b)  funding the training and overtime of peace officers; and
(c)  managing driving under the influence related abandoned vehicles.
(3)  The Legislature finds that these monies are for a general and statewide
public purpose.
